src/morphology/compounding.lexc
LEXICON R
!+Cmp#:# # ; ! For turning off compounding during testing
! +Cmp#:# NounRoot ;
 +Cmp@D.compound.block@#:0@D.compound.block@# NounRoot ;
 +Cmp@D.compound.block@#-:0@D.compound.block@#- ProperNoun ;


LEXICON Rhyph
 +Cmp@D.compound.block@#-:0@D.compound.block@#- NounRoot ;
 +Cmp@D.compound.block@#-:0@D.compound.block@#- ProperNoun ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# NounRoot ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 
